Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 1 Abatement of Nuisances

10-1-1.
Action to abate nuisance — Contents.

Whenever a nuisance is alleged to exist, the attorney general or any citizen of the state may bring an action in the name of the state, upon the relation of the attorney general or of an individual citizen, to abate the nuisance and to perpetually enjoin the person or persons maintaining the nuisance and any or all persons owning any legal or equitable interest in the place from further maintaining or permitting the nuisance either directly or indirectly. The complaint shall be duly sworn to by the complaining party, unless brought by the attorney general, and shall set forth the names of the parties, the object of the action, a description of the place complained of, and a statement of the facts constituting the alleged nuisance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-1

.

10-1-2.
Filing of action — Application for temporary injunction.

The action shall be filed in the superior court of the county in which the nuisance is alleged to exist. Upon the filing of the action, application for a temporary injunction may be made to any justice of the superior court, and the justice shall order process to issue for a hearing to be held on the application within twenty (20) days thereafter. If the court shall not be in session in the county for which the action is filed on the date for the hearing, the process shall be made returnable to the court at Providence and the hearing shall be held at Providence, unless otherwise agreed by the parties or ordered by the court. Notice of the time and place of the hearing of the application for a temporary injunction shall be served upon the defendants named in the complaint at least three (3) days before the hearing. The hearing shall have precedence over all matters upon the docket.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-2

; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 20.

10-1-3.
Temporary injunction — Enforcement.

If it shall appear to the court at the hearing that the alleged nuisance exists, a temporary injunction shall issue enjoining any and all respondents from further maintaining or permitting the nuisance, and from removing any personal property from the place where the nuisance is alleged to exist. It shall be within the power of the court to require any and all respondents to furnish a bond in a given amount, with or without surety, within such time as the court shall direct, conditioned upon the due observance of the temporary injunction. Any violation of the temporary injunction or any condition thereof shall be contempt of court to be punished as provided in §

10-1-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 79.

10-1-4.
Application of rules of equity.

Proceedings under this chapter shall follow the usual and accepted rules of equity, except as provided in this chapter or otherwise provided by statute or rule of court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 79.

10-1-5.
Evidence of reputation — Conviction of offenses against decency.

In any hearing in proceedings under this chapter, evidence of the general reputation of the place, or the conviction, whether by trial or plea, including a plea of nolo, of any person of the violation of statutes against prostitution, lewdness, or assignation committed in any such place shall be admissible for the purposes of proving the existence of the nuisance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-5

.

10-1-6.
Substitution of attorney general for original plaintiff — Costs against plaintiff.

No action filed under §

10-1-1

shall be dismissed without the consent of the attorney general, and if the attorney general is of the opinion that the action ought not to be dismissed, he or she may be substituted for the original plaintiff and prosecute the case to a final decree. If the action is brought by a person other than the attorney general and the court finds that there is no reasonable ground therefor, costs shall be awarded against the plaintiff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-6

.

10-1-7.
Decree and order of abatement — Sale of property.

If the existence of a nuisance shall finally be admitted or established in any proceeding under this chapter, a decree permanently enjoining the maintenance thereof shall be entered, and, in addition thereto, an order of abatement shall be entered, directing a deputy sheriff to enter the place where the nuisance exists and to sell and remove, in the manner provided for the sale of goods and chattels under execution, all personal property used in maintaining the nuisance, unless the owner of the personal property shall prove to the satisfaction of the court that he or she had no knowledge and by the exercise of reasonable diligence could not have learned of the maintenance of the nuisance before the filing of the complaint, and the court may further direct that the place where the nuisance exists shall be kept closed for all purposes for a period of one year unless otherwise ordered. The proceeds of any sale under this section shall be applied first to the payment of all costs incurred in connection with the proceedings brought under this chapter in connection with the nuisance, and secondly to the payment of a reasonable counsel fee for the plaintiff, and any balance remaining shall be paid to the owner of the property so sold.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-7

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 22.

10-1-8.
Dissolution of order to keep closed.

The owner or lessor of any place ordered closed pursuant to §

10-1-7

may, at any time, have the order to keep the place closed dissolved upon the payment of all costs incurred and upon the filing of a bond in such sum and with such surety as shall be fixed and approved by the court, conditioned upon the immediate abatement of the nuisance and against any further maintenance thereof, provided the owner or lessor shall prove to the satisfaction of the court that he or she had no knowledge and by the exercise of reasonable diligence could not have learned of the existence of the nuisance before the commencement of the action.

The dissolution of the order to keep the place closed shall not release the place from any judgment, lien, penalty, or liability, to which it may be subject by law. If any person shall break and enter or use a place ordered closed pursuant to §

10-1-7

, he or she shall be punished for contempt as provided in §

10-1-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 79.

10-1-9.
Proceedings after conviction in criminal proceedings.

In case the existence of a nuisance, as defined in §§

11-30-1

and

11-30-2

, is established in criminal proceedings, the attorney general may proceed under this chapter to enforce the provisions and penalties of this chapter, and the finding of the defendant guilty in such criminal proceedings, unless reversed or set aside, shall be conclusive evidence as against the defendant as to the existence of a nuisance in proceedings under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-9

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 79.

10-1-10.
Proceedings and punishment for contempt.

In case any person fails to comply with any order of the court or is otherwise in contempt of court under the provisions of this chapter, the court may try and punish the offender. Contempt proceedings shall be commenced by filing with the clerk of the court a complaint under oath, setting forth the facts, and the court shall thereupon cite the offender to appear and answer to the complaint. Any person found guilty of contempt of court under the provisions of this chapter shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) and by imprisonment in the adult correctional institutions for not less than three (3) months nor more than six (6) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 672, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 598, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

10-1-10

; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1.